Tennessee statutes. Title 60 Oil And Gas
Part 6

Oil and Gas Surface Owners Compensation

60-1-601. Short title.

This part shall be known as and may be cited as the “Oil and Gas Surface Owners Compensation Act of 1984.”

Acts 1984, ch. 863, § 2.

60-1-602. Purpose.

The general assembly finds that the exploration for and development of oil and gas reserves must coexist with the equal right to the use, agricultural or otherwise, of the surface of land within this state.

It is the purpose of this part to provide constitutionally permissible protection and compensation to surface owners of land on which oil and gas wells are drilled for the burden resulting from such drilling operations. This part shall be interpreted to benefit surface owners regardless of when any particular oil and gas estate was separated from the surface estate and regardless of who executed that document.

Acts 1984, ch. 863, § 2.

60-1-603. Part definitions.

For purposes of this part and unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the terms listed below will have the following meaning:

“Drilling operation” means the actual drilling or redrilling of an oil or gas well and the related preparation of the drilling site and access roads, which requires entry upon the surface estate;

“Oil and gas developer” means the person who acquires the oil and gas estate by any legal means for the purpose of extracting therefrom oil or gas;

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, firm, partnership, venture, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary or other representative of any kind, and includes any government or any political subdivision or agency thereof;

“Surface owner” means a person who owns an estate in fee in the surface of land overlying an oil and gas estate being developed, either solely or as a co-owner.

Acts 1984, ch. 863, § 2.

60-1-604. Compensation of surface owners for drilling operations.

The oil and gas developer shall be obligated to pay the surface owner for:

Lost income or expenses incurred as a result of being unable to dedicate land actually occupied by the driller's operation or to which access is prevented by such drilling operation to the uses to which it was dedicated prior to commencement of the activity for which a permit was obtained, measured from the date the operator enters upon the land;

The market value of crops destroyed, damaged or prevented from reaching market;

Any damage to a water supply in use prior to the commencement of the permitted activity;

The cost of repair of personal property up to the value of replacement by personal property of like age, wear and quality; and

The diminution in value, if any, of the surface lands and other property after completion of the surface disturbance done pursuant to the activity for which the permit was issued, determined according to the actual use made thereof by the surface owner immediately prior to the commencement of the permitted activity.

Acts 1984, ch. 863, § 2.

60-1-605. Notice of claim.

Any surface owner, to receive compensation under this part shall notify by certified mail, return receipt requested, the oil and gas developer of the damages sustained by the person within three (3) years after the injury occurs.

Acts 1984, ch. 863, § 2.

60-1-606. Response to persons seeking compensation.

Within sixty (60) days after the oil and gas developer receives notice of damages, the oil and gas developer shall make a written response to the person seeking compensation for the damages.

Acts 1984, ch. 863, § 2.

60-1-607. Arbitration.

If the person seeking compensation receives a written rejection, rejects any counter-offer of the oil and gas developer, or receives no reply, that person may bring an action for compensation in a court of proper jurisdiction or the parties may elect to proceed by arbitration as provided herein. If the amount of compensation awarded by arbitration or the court is greater than that which had been offered by the oil and gas developer, the person seeking compensation shall also be awarded reasonable attorney fees, costs of expert witnesses, any other costs which may be legally assessed, and interest on the amount of the final compensation awarded from the day drilling was commenced.

The person seeking compensation, in place of bringing an action in court, can request of the oil and gas developer in writing by certified mail, return receipt requested, that compensation be determined by binding arbitration. If the oil and gas developer agrees to binding arbitration, the developer shall notify the person seeking compensation of consent to arbitration in writing within fifteen (15) days of receiving the request.

In the event of binding arbitration, compensation to be awarded the surface owner shall be determined by a disinterested arbitrator chosen by the surface owner and the oil and gas developer from a list of arbitrators approved by the American Arbitration Association.

Such hearings shall be conducted as provided in title 29, chapter 5, part 3.

Each party shall pay one-half (½) the compensation due the arbitrator.

Acts 1984, ch. 863, § 2.

60-1-608. Common law remedies preserved.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to diminish in any way the common law remedies, including damages, of a surface owner or any other person against the oil and gas developer for the unreasonable, negligent or otherwise wrongful exercise of the contractual right, whether express or implied, to use the surface of the land for the benefit of the developer's interest.

Acts 1984, ch. 863, § 2.